finished/ote.foma
def GSY2Rules2 Verb
    		    [["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá ʔ} |
		     ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí ʔ}        |
		     ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá ʔ}          |
		     ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga ʔ}          |
		     ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí ʔ}|
		     ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí ʔ}|
		     ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí ʔ} |
		     ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí ʔ} |
		     ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí ʔ} |
		     ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{ʔ}] addGSY2 ;

#in most 3p forms the p changes to m
def pTOm {pa¹²nts’i}|{pa²ʔmbi}|{pa²t’i}|
{pant’i}|{past’i}|{pe¹²ngi}|{pi¹²ts’i}|{pọ²ke}|{pụ¹²ki};

def pTOmRegular Verb [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga } |
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0    |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá }          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá }] mTOp ;

def pTOmFix p -> m ;
def pTOmRules Verb [["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi }          |
                    ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki }        |
                    ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa }  |
                    ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da }] pTOm .o. pTOmFix ;

def addnTOjLemmas {jua²ts’i} | {jo²ʔo} ;
def addnTOjRegular Verb [["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		       ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0] addnTOjLemmas ;
		       
def addnTOjRules Verb [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga n} |
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi n} |
		 ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa n}  |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí n} |
		 ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki n} |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá n}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá n}          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi n}] addnTOjLemmas ;		      

def tsTOzLemmas {tsä²t’i}|{tsẹ²ki}|{tsi}|{tsi²ʔti}|{tsots’i} ;

def tsTOzRegular Verb [ ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{ga } |
	         ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gi } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{stá } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{xká } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{stí } |
		 ["[PRF]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{xkí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PST]"]:{ndí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PST]"]:{ngí }|
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{mí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[1]" "[PRS]"]:{dí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[2]" "[PRS]"]:{gí } |
		 ["[IPFV]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:0    |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[1]"]:{dá }          |
		 ["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[2]"]:{gá }] tsTOzLemmas ;

def tsTOzFix {ts} -> z || .#. (?) (?) (?) " " _ ;
def tsTOzRules Verb [["[PFV]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{bi }         |
                    ["[PRF]" "[3]" "[PST]"]:{xki }        |
                    ["[PRF]" "[SG]" "[3]" "[PRS]"]:{xa }  |
                    ["[IRR]" "[SG]" "[3]"]:{da }] tsTOzLemmas .o. tsTOzFix ;



def Cleanup [%²|%¹|%-|%'|%`] -> 0 ;
def Grammar [[RulesGSN | SpecLemmaVChange1Rules | SpecLemmaVowelStartMixGSRules1 | SpecLemmaVowelStartMixGSRules2 | SpecLemmaVowelStartMixGSRules3 | RulesGSY | RulesGSonly | notNHY | addNHY | AddN | tLemmasRegular | tTOdRules | kRegular | kTOg | fLemmasRegular | fTOmf | fTOmRegular | fTOmonly | hTOhn | gLemmasaddn | gsmixgsnRules | dStartAddN | hLemmasRegular | hTOhyRules | pTOmpRegular | pTOmpRules | thADDnRegular | thADDnRules | hLemmas2nAFTERhRules | hLemmas2Regular | GSY2Rules | GSY2Rules2 | pTOmRegular | pTOmRules | addnTOjRegular | addnTOjRules | tsTOzRegular | tsTOzRules ] .P. RegularRules] .o. Cleanup ;
regex Canonicalize(Grammar) ;
#watt > ote.att
save stack ote.fomabin
